Washington statutes.
RCW 35.36.040

Designation of bonds to be signed.

(1) The officer whose duty it is to cause any bonds to be printed, engraved, or lithographed, shall specify in a written order or requisition to the printer, engraver, or lithographer the number of bonds to be printed, engraved, or lithographed and the manner of numbering them.

(2) Every printer, engraver, or lithographer who prints, engraves, or lithographs a greater number of bonds than that specified or who prints, engraves, or lithographs more than one bond bearing the same number is guilty of a class B felony punishable according to chapter 9A.20 RCW.

[ 2003 c 53 s 199; 1965 c 7 s 35.36.040. Prior: 1929 c 212 s 6; RRS s 9005-10.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—2003 c 53: See notes following RCW 2.48.180.